Hawaii statutes.
§122A-2 Hawaii state defense force
established. The Hawaii state defense force is established as a component
of the militia of the State. [L 1987, c 35, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 135, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next